Hawaii statutes.
[§551G-6] Taking testimony in another
state. (a) In a guardianship or protective proceeding, in addition to
other procedures that may be available, testimony of a witness who is located
in another state may be offered by deposition or other means allowable in the
State of Hawaii for testimony taken in another state. The court on its own
motion may order that the testimony of a witness be taken in another state and
may prescribe the manner in which and the terms upon which the testimony is to
be taken.

(b) In a guardianship or protective
proceeding, a court of the State of Hawaii may permit a witness located in
another state to be deposed or to testify by telephone or audiovisual or other
electronic means. A court of the State of Hawaii shall cooperate with the
court of the other state in designating an appropriate location for the
deposition or testimony.

(c) Documentary evidence transmitted from
another state to a court of the State of Hawaii by technological means that do
not produce an original writing may not be excluded from evidence on an
objection based on Rule 1002 of the Hawaii Rules of Evidence. [L 2012, c 236,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next